Utah statutes.
77-32-502.   Indigent Inmate Trust Fund -- Creation.
(1)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund known as the "Indigent
Inmate Trust Fund" to be disbursed by the Division of Finance at the direction
of the board and in accordance with contracts made under Section 77-32-402.
(2)  Money deposited in this trust fund only shall be used:
(a)  to pay for the representation, costs, and expenses of legal defense
counsel for an indigent inmate in a state prison located in a county of the
third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class as defined in Section 17-50-501 who is
charged with having committed a crime within the facility, and who will
require defense counsel; and
(b)  for administrative costs pursuant to Section 77-32-401.
(3)  The trust fund consists of:
(a)  proceeds received from counties that impose the additional tax levy by
ordinance under Subsection 77-32-501(5) which shall be the total county
obligation for payment of costs listed in Subsection (2) for defense of
indigent inmates;
(b)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature; and
(c)  interest and earnings from the investment of fund money.
(4)  Fund money shall be invested by the state treasurer with the earnings and
interest accruing to the fund.
(5)  In any calendar year in which the fund runs a deficit, or is projected to
run a deficit, the board shall request a supplemental appropriation from the
Legislature in the following general session to pay for the deficit.  The
state shall pay any or all of the reasonable and necessary money for the
deficit into the Indigent Inmate Trust Fund.
(6)  The fund shall be capped at $1,000,000.
(7)  The Division of Finance shall notify all contributing counties when the
fund approaches $1,000,000 and provide each county with the amount of the
balance in the fund.
(8)  Upon notification by the Division of Finance that the fund is near the
limit imposed in Subsection (6), the counties may contribute enough money to
enable the fund to reach $1,000,000 and discontinue contributions until
notified by the Division of Finance that the balance has fallen below
$1,000,000, at which time counties that meet the requirements of Section
77-32-501 shall resume contributions.
